Connecticut, session 2026, HB05117.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish
an additional marginal rate for the personal income tax of at least four
per cent on the portion of an individual's taxable income in excess of one
million dollars, and (2) dedicate the revenue generated from such tax to
education; universal school meals; school construction, repair, capital
projects and expenditures; higher education and free public colleges and
universities; child care; higher wages for child care workers; baby
supplies for parents and guardians of newborn infants; the repair and
maintenance of, and access to, roads, bridges and public transportation;
and free public transit.